Nevada, session 2025Special36, AB6.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.473 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.473 1. As used in this section, “traffic violation” means
conviction of a moving traffic violation in any municipal court,
justice court or district court in this State or a finding by any
municipal court or justice court in this State that a person has
committed a civil infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive. The term includes a finding by a juvenile court
that a child has violated a traffic law or ordinance other than one
governing standing or parking. The term does not include:
(a) A conviction or a finding by a juvenile court of a violation of
the speed limit posted by a public authority under the circumstances
described in subsection 1 of NRS 484B.617; or
(b) A citation issued for a violation detected by a school bus
infraction detection system pursuant to NRS 484A.605.
2. [The] Subject to section 2 of this act, the Department shall
establish a uniform system of demerit points for various traffic
violations occurring within this State affecting the driving privilege
of any person who holds a driver’s license issued by the Department
and persons deemed to have future driving privileges pursuant to
NRS 483.447. The system must be based on the accumulation of
demerits during a period of 12 months.
3. The system must be uniform in its operation, and the
Department shall set up a schedule of demerits for each traffic
violation, depending upon the gravity of the violation, on a scale of
one demerit point for a minor violation of any traffic law to eight
demerit points for an extremely serious violation of the law
governing traffic violations. If a conviction of two or more traffic
violations committed on a single occasion is obtained, points must
be assessed for one offense or civil infraction, and if the point values
differ, points must be assessed for the offense or civil infraction
having the greater point value. Details of the violation must be
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 3 –
submitted to the Department by the court where the conviction or
finding is obtained. The Department may provide for a graduated
system of demerits within each category of violations according to
the extent to which the traffic law was violated.
Sec. 2. Chapter 484B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a person who
is found to have committed a violation of a speed limit, or
convicted of or found to have committed a violation of NRS
484B.150, 484B.163, 484B.165, 484B.200 to 484B.217, inclusive,
484B.223, 484B.227, 484B.270, 484B.280, 484B.283, 484B.300,
484B.303, 484B.307, 484B.317, 484B.320, 484B.327, 484B.403,
484B.450, 484B.600, 484B.603, 484B.650, 484B.653, 484B.657,
484C.110 or 484C.120, that occurred in an active school zone or
an active school crossing zone may:
(a) If the violation is a criminal offense, be punished by
imprisonment or by a fine, or both, for a term or an amount equal
to and in addition to the term of imprisonment or amount of the
fine, or both, that the court imposes for the primary offense.
(b) If the violation is a civil infraction punishable pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, be punished by a civil
penalty in an amount equal to and in addition to the civil penalty
that the court imposes for the primary infraction.
2. If a violation described in subsection 1 is:
(a) A criminal offense, the additional penalty imposed
pursuant to subsection 1 must not exceed a total of $1,000, 6
months of imprisonment or 120 hours of community service.
(b) A civil infraction punishable pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive, the additional penalty imposed pursuant to
subsection 1 must not exceed a total of $250.
3. If a person is subject to an additional penalty pursuant to
subsection 1, the Department shall assess against the person twice
the number of demerit points assigned to the offense by the
uniform system of demerit points under NRS 483.473.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Active school zone” or “active school crossing zone”
means a school zone or school crossing zone:
(1) If the school zone or school crossing zone is designated
by an operational speed limit beacon, during the hours when
pupils are in class and the yellow lights of the speed limit beacon
are flashing in a manner that indicates that the speed limit is in
effect; or
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 4 –
(2) If the school zone or school crossing zone is not
designated by an operational speed limit beacon, during the times
when the sign designating the school zone or school crossing
indicates that the speed limit is in effect.
(b) “Speed limit beacon” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 484B.363.
Sec. 3. NRS 484B.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.150 1. It is a misdemeanor for a person to drink an
alcoholic beverage while the person is driving or in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle upon a highway.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, it is a
misdemeanor for a person to have an open container of an alcoholic
beverage within the passenger area of a motor vehicle while the
motor vehicle is upon a highway. This subsection does not apply to:
(a) The passenger area of a motor vehicle which is designed,
maintained or used primarily for the transportation of persons for
compensation; or
(b) The living quarters of a house coach or house trailer,
 but does apply to the driver of such a motor vehicle who is in
possession or control of an open container of an alcoholic beverage.
3. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Alcoholic beverage” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.015.
(b) “Open container” means a container which has been opened
or the seal of which has been broken.
(c) “Passenger area” means that area of a vehicle which is
designed for the seating of the driver or a passenger.
Sec. 4. NRS 484B.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.163 1. A person shall not drive a vehicle when it is so
loaded, or when there are in the front seat such number of persons,
exceeding three, as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or
sides of the vehicle or as to interfere with the driver’s control over
the driving mechanism of the vehicle.
2. A passenger in a vehicle shall not ride in such position as to
interfere with the driver’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere
with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484D.440, a vehicle
must not be operated upon any highway unless the driver’s vision
through any required glass equipment is normal.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 5 –
4. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 5. NRS 484B.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.165 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person shall not, while operating a motor vehicle on a highway in
this State:
(a) Manually type or enter text into a cellular telephone or other
handheld wireless communications device, or send or read data
using any such device to access or search the Internet or to engage
in nonvoice communications with another person, including,
without limitation, texting, electronic messaging and instant
messaging.
(b) Use a cellular telephone or other handheld wireless
communications device to engage in voice communications with
another person, unless the device is used with an accessory which
allows the person to communicate without using his or her hands,
other than to activate, deactivate or initiate a feature or function on
the device.
2. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A paid or volunteer firefighter, emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic,
ambulance attendant or other person trained to provide emergency
medical services who is acting within the course and scope of his or
her employment.
(b) A law enforcement officer or any person designated by a
sheriff or chief of police or the Director of the Department of Public
Safety who is acting within the course and scope of his or her
employment.
(c) A person who is reporting a medical emergency, a safety
hazard or criminal activity or who is requesting assistance relating
to a medical emergency, a safety hazard or criminal activity.
(d) A person who is responding to a situation requiring
immediate action to protect the health, welfare or safety of the
driver or another person and stopping the vehicle would be
inadvisable, impractical or dangerous.
(e) A person who is licensed by the Federal Communications
Commission as an amateur radio operator and who is providing a
communication service in connection with an actual or impending
disaster or emergency, participating in a drill, test, or other exercise
in preparation for a disaster or emergency or otherwise
communicating public information.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 6 –
(f) An employee or contractor of a public utility who uses a
handheld wireless communications device:
(1) That has been provided by the public utility; and
(2) While responding to a dispatch by the public utility to
respond to an emergency, including, without limitation, a response
to a power outage or an interruption in utility service.
3. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the use of a
voice-operated global positioning or navigation system that is
affixed to the vehicle.
4. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 is
guilty of a civil infraction punishable pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive, and:
(a) For the first violation within the immediately preceding 7
years, shall pay a civil penalty of $50.
(b) For the second violation within the immediately preceding 7
years, shall pay a civil penalty of $100.
(c) For the third or subsequent violation within the immediately
preceding 7 years, shall pay a civil penalty of $250.
5. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
6. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not treat a first
violation of this section in the manner statutorily required for a
moving traffic violation.
7. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed
not to be operating a motor vehicle if the motor vehicle is driven
autonomously and the autonomous operation of the motor vehicle is
authorized by law.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Handheld wireless communications device” means a
handheld device for the transfer of information without the use of
electrical conductors or wires and includes, without limitation, a
cellular telephone, a personal digital assistant, a pager and a text
messaging device. The term does not include a device used for two-
way radio communications if:
(1) The person using the device has a license to operate the
device, if required; and
(2) All the controls for operating the device, other than the
microphone and a control to speak into the microphone, are located
on a unit which is used to transmit and receive communications and
which is separate from the microphone and is not intended to be
held.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 7 –
(b) “Public utility” means a supplier of electricity or natural gas
or a provider of telecommunications service for public use who is
subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada.
Sec. 6. NRS 484B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.200 1. Upon all highways of sufficient width a vehicle
must be driven upon the right half of the highway, except as
follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in
the same direction under the laws governing such movements;
(b) When the right half of the highway is closed to traffic;
(c) Upon a highway divided into three lanes for traffic under the
laws applicable thereon;
(d) Upon a highway designated and posted for one-way traffic;
or
(e) When the highway is not of sufficient width.
2. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 484B.203 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.203 1. Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite
directions shall pass each other keeping to the right, and upon
highways having width for not more than one line of traffic in each
direction, each driver shall give to the other at least one-half of the
paved portion of the highway as nearly as possible.
2. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 8. NRS 484B.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.207 1. The driver of a vehicle overtaking another
vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left thereof
at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the
highway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle.
2. Except when overtaking and passing on the right is
permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the
right in favor of the overtaking vehicle upon observing the
overtaking vehicle or hearing a signal. The driver of an overtaken
vehicle shall not increase the speed of the vehicle until completely
passed by the overtaking vehicle.
3. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 9. NRS 484B.208 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.208 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
on a controlled-access highway which has two or more clearly
marked lanes for traveling in the same direction, a driver may not
continue to operate a motor vehicle in the extreme left lane if the
driver knows, or reasonably should know, that he or she is traveling
at a rate of speed which is less than the posted speed limit for that
portion of the controlled-access highway and is being overtaken in
that lane from the rear by a motor vehicle traveling at a higher rate
of speed.
2. The requirements of subsection 1 do not apply:
(a) To a driver operating a motor vehicle that is:
(1) Overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same
direction;
(2) Preparing for a left turn at an intersection;
(3) Traveling in a lane designated for the use of high-
occupancy vehicles pursuant to NRS 484A.460, if the driver
complies with the requirements to travel in such a lane; or
(4) Engaged in the construction, maintenance or repair of the
highway, including, without limitation, the removal of snow.
(b) When traffic conditions, inclement weather, obstructions or
hazards make it necessary to drive in the extreme left lane.
(c) When compliance with an official traffic control device or
the directions given by a peace officer makes it necessary to drive in
the extreme left lane.
(d) To the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle in the
course of his or her official duties.
(e) To a driver operating a motor vehicle within the
geographical limits of a city or town.
3. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135, or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 10. NRS 484B.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.210 1. The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass
upon the right of another vehicle only under the following
conditions:
(a) When the driver of the vehicle overtaken is making or
signaling to make a left turn.
(b) Upon a highway with unobstructed pavement which is not
occupied by parked vehicles and which is of sufficient width for two
or more lines of moving vehicles in each direction.
(c) Upon a highway with unobstructed pavement which is not
marked as a traffic lane and which is not occupied by parked
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 9 –
vehicles, if the vehicle that is overtaking and passing another
vehicle:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, does not
travel more than 200 feet in the section of pavement not marked as a
traffic lane; or
(2) While being driven in the section of pavement not
marked as a traffic lane, does not travel through an intersection or
past any private way that is used to enter or exit the highway.
(d) Upon any highway on which traffic is restricted to one
direction of movement, where the highway is free from obstructions
and of sufficient width for two or more lines of moving vehicles.
2. The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another
vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting such
movement in safety.
3. The driver of a vehicle shall not overtake and pass another
vehicle upon the right when such movement requires driving off the
paved portion of the highway.
4. The provisions of subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) An authorized emergency vehicle described in
NRS 484A.480;
(b) A vehicle which has been issued a permit to operate as an
authorized emergency vehicle pursuant to NRS 484A.490;
(c) A traffic incident management vehicle;
(d) A tow car;
(e) A coroner vehicle; or
(f) A public transit motor bus,
 that is being driven on the paved shoulder of a highway where
lawfully placed signage allows that vehicle to use the shoulder in
that manner.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Coroner vehicle” means an authorized vehicle used by a
county coroner, medical examiner or medicolegal death
investigator:
(1) Responding to the scene of a death; or
(2) Transporting a dead human body.
(b) “Hazardous material vehicle” means a vehicle used by the
Department of Transportation for the cleanup of a spill of hazardous
or illicit material, solid waste or other environmental hazards on or
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 10 –
adjacent to a highway or within the rights-of-way of the Department
of Transportation.
(c) “Public transit motor bus” means a vehicle used by a public
transit system, designed for carrying more than 10 passengers and
used for the transportation of persons for compensation.
(d) “Public transit system” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 277A.120.
(e) “Traffic incident” means any vehicle, person, condition or
other traffic hazard which is located on or near a roadway and which
poses a danger to the flow of traffic or to a person involved in,
responding to or assisting with the traffic hazard.
(f) “Traffic incident management vehicle” means an authorized
vehicle used by the Department of Transportation to provide aid to
motorists or to mitigate traffic incidents and which makes use of
flashing amber warning lights that meet the requirements of
subsection 1 of NRS 484D.185 and any standards approved by the
Department of Public Safety. The term includes:
(1) Vehicles operating as part of the Freeway Service Patrol
of the Department of Transportation; and
(2) Vehicles, including, without limitation, hazardous
material vehicles, which respond to traffic incidents, motor vehicle
crashes or other emergencies for purposes other than providing
police, fire and emergency medical services.
Sec. 11. NRS 484B.213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.213 1. A vehicle must not be driven to the left side of
the center of a two-lane, two-directional highway and overtaking
and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, unless
such left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a
sufficient distance ahead to permit such overtaking and passing to
be completely made without interfering with the safe operation of
any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle
overtaken.
2. A vehicle must not be driven to the left side of the highway
at any time:
(a) When approaching the crest of a grade or upon a curve in the
highway where the driver’s view is obstructed within such distance
as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach
from the opposite direction.
(b) When approaching within 100 feet or traversing any
intersection or railroad grade crossing.
(c) When the view is obstructed upon approaching within 100
feet of any bridge, viaduct or tunnel.
3. Subsection 2 does not apply upon a one-way highway.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 11 –
4. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 12. NRS 484B.217 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.217 1. The Department of Transportation with respect
to highways constructed under the authority of chapter 408 of NRS,
and local authorities with respect to highways under their
jurisdiction, may determine those zones of highways where
overtaking and passing to the left or making a left-hand turn would
be hazardous, and may by the erection of official traffic-control
devices indicate such zones. When such devices are in place and
clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, every driver of a
vehicle shall obey the directions thereof.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, a
driver shall not drive on the left side of the highway within such
zone or drive across or on the left side of any pavement striping
designed to mark such zone throughout its length.
3. A driver may drive across a pavement striping marking such
zone to an adjoining highway if the driver has first given the
appropriate turn signal and there will be no impediment to
oncoming or following traffic.
4. Except where otherwise provided, a driver may drive across
a pavement striping marking such a zone to make a left-hand turn if
the driver has first given the appropriate turn signal in compliance
with NRS 484B.413, if it is safe and if it would not be an
impediment to oncoming or following traffic.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 13. NRS 484B.223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.223 1. If a highway has two or more clearly marked
lanes for traffic traveling in one direction, vehicles must:
(a) Be driven as nearly as practicable entirely within a single
lane; and
(b) Not be moved from that lane until the driver has given the
appropriate turn signal and ascertained that such movement can be
made with safety.
2. Upon a highway which has been divided into three clearly
marked lanes, a vehicle must not be driven in the extreme left lane
at any time. A vehicle on such a highway must not be driven in the
center lane except:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle where the
highway is clearly visible and the center lane is clear of traffic for a
safe distance;
(b) In preparation for a left turn; or
(c) When the center lane is allocated exclusively to traffic
moving in the direction in which the vehicle is proceeding and a
sign is posted to give notice of such allocation.
3. If a highway has been designed to provide a single center
lane to be used only for turning by traffic moving in both directions,
the following rules apply:
(a) A vehicle may be driven in the center turn lane only for the
purpose of making a left-hand turn onto or from the highway.
(b) A vehicle must not travel more than 200 feet in a center turn
lane before making a left-hand turn from the highway.
(c) A vehicle must not travel more than 50 feet in a center turn
lane after making a left-hand turn onto the highway before merging
with traffic.
4. If a highway has been designed to provide a single right lane
to be used only for turning, a vehicle must:
(a) Be driven in the right turn lane only for the purpose of
making a right turn; and
(b) While being driven in the right turn lane, not travel through
an intersection.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 14. NRS 484B.227 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.227 1. Every vehicle driven upon a divided highway
must be driven only upon the right-hand roadway and must not be
driven over, across or within any dividing space, barrier or section
or make any left turn, semicircular turn or U-turn, except through an
opening in the barrier or dividing section or space or at a crossover
or intersection established by a public authority.
2. A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor.
3. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 15. NRS 484B.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.270 1. The driver of a motor vehicle shall not
intentionally interfere with the movement of a person lawfully
riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric scooter.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 13 –
2. When overtaking or passing a bicycle, an electric bicycle or
an electric scooter proceeding in the same direction, the driver of a
motor vehicle shall exercise due care and:
(a) If there is more than one lane for traffic proceeding in the
same direction, move the vehicle to the lane to the immediate left, if
the lane is available and moving into the lane is reasonably safe; or
(b) If there is only one lane for traffic proceeding in the same
direction, pass to the left of the bicycle, electric bicycle or electric
scooter at a safe distance, which must be not less than 3 feet
between any portion of the vehicle and the bicycle, electric bicycle
or electric scooter, and shall not move again to the right side of the
highway until the vehicle is safely clear of the overtaken bicycle,
electric bicycle or electric scooter. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 484B.213 and 484B.217, when passing to the left of a bicycle,
electric bicycle or electric scooter at a safe distance of not less than
3 feet between any portion of the vehicle and the bicycle, electric
bicycle or electric scooter, this paragraph authorizes the driver, if it
is safe, to pass:
(1) To the left of the center of the highway.
(2) In a no-passing zone.
3. The driver of a motor vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to
any person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric scooter
or a pedestrian as provided in subsection 6 of NRS 484B.297 on the
pathway or lane. The driver of a motor vehicle shall not enter, stop,
stand, park or drive within a pathway or lane provided for bicycles,
electric bicycles or electric scooters except:
(a) When entering or exiting an alley or driveway;
(b) When operating or parking a disabled vehicle;
(c) To avoid conflict with other traffic;
(d) In the performance of official duties;
(e) In compliance with the directions of a police officer; or
(f) In an emergency.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the driver of a
motor vehicle shall not enter or proceed through an intersection
while driving within a pathway or lane provided for bicycles,
electric bicycles or electric scooters.
5. The driver of a motor vehicle shall:
(a) Exercise due care to avoid a collision with a person riding a
bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric scooter; and
(b) Give an audible warning with the horn of the vehicle if
appropriate and when necessary to avoid such a collision.
6. If, while violating any provision of subsections 1 to 5,
inclusive, the driver of a motor vehicle is the proximate cause of a
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 14 –
collision with a person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter, the driver is subject to the additional penalty set
forth in subsection 4 of NRS 484B.653.
7. The operator of a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric
scooter shall not:
(a) Intentionally interfere with the movement of a motor vehicle;
or
(b) Overtake and pass a motor vehicle unless the operator can do
so safely without endangering himself or herself or the occupants of
the motor vehicle.
8. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in section 2 of this act.
Sec. 16. NRS 484B.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.280 1. A driver of a motor vehicle shall:
(a) Exercise due care to avoid a collision with a pedestrian;
(b) Give an audible warning with the horn of the vehicle if
appropriate and when necessary to avoid such a collision; and
(c) Exercise proper caution upon observing a pedestrian:
(1) On or near a highway, street or road;
(2) At or near a bus stop or bench, shelter or transit stop for
passengers of public mass transportation or in the act of boarding a
bus or other public transportation vehicle; or
(3) In or near a school zone or a school crossing zone marked
in accordance with NRS [484B.363] 484B.367 or a marked or
unmarked crosswalk.
2. If, while violating any provision of this section, the driver of
a motor vehicle is the proximate cause of a collision with a
pedestrian, the driver is subject to the additional penalty set forth in
subsection 4 of NRS 484B.653.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may be
subject to the additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.135 [.] or
section 2 of this act.
Sec. 17. NRS 484B.283 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.283 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484B.287,
484B.290 and 484B.350:
(a) When official traffic-control devices are not in place or not
in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way,
slowing down or stopping if need be so to yield, to a pedestrian
crossing the highway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is
upon the half of the highway upon which the vehicle is traveling or
onto which the vehicle is turning, or when the pedestrian is
approaching so closely from the opposite half of the highway as to
be in danger.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 15 –
(b) A pedestrian shall not suddenly leave a curb or other place of
safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close
that it is impossible for the driver to yield.
(c) Whenever a vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at
an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection, the driver of any other
vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass the
stopped vehicle until the driver has determined that the vehicle
being overtaken was not stopped for the purpose of permitting a
pedestrian to cross the highway.
(d) Whenever signals exhibiting the words “Walk,” “Don’t
Walk,” “Wait” or similar symbols are in place, such signals indicate
as follows:
(1) While the “Walk” indication or walking person symbol is
illuminated, pedestrians facing the signal may proceed across the
highway in the direction of the signal and must be given the right-
of-way by the drivers of all vehicles.
(2) While the “Don’t Walk” or “Wait” indication or an
upraised hand symbol is illuminated, is flashing and is accompanied
by a countdown timer, a pedestrian may proceed across the highway
in the direction of the signal, but must complete the crossing before
the countdown timer gets to zero.
(3) While the “Don’t Walk” or “Wait” indication or an
upraised hand symbol is illuminated and flashing but is not
accompanied by a countdown timer, a pedestrian may not proceed to
cross the highway, but a pedestrian who entered the highway
lawfully pursuant to subparagraph (1) may continue to cross the
highway but must proceed to a curb, sidewalk, safety zone if one is
provided or other place of safety before the “Don’t Walk” or “Wait”
indication or an upraised hand symbol is illuminated and steady.
(4) While the “Don’t Walk” or “Wait” indication or an
upraised hand symbol is illuminated and steady a pedestrian may
not proceed to cross the highway, but a pedestrian who entered the
highway lawfully pursuant to subparagraph (1) or (2) may continue
to cross the highway but must proceed to a curb, sidewalk, safety
zone if one is provided or other place of safety as soon as possible.
2. If, while violating paragraph (a) or (c) of subsection 1, the
driver of a motor vehicle is the proximate cause of a collision with a
pedestrian, the driver is subject to the additional penalty set forth in
subsection 4 of NRS 484B.653.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may be
subject to the additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.135 [.] or
section 2 of this act.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 16 –
4. As used in this section, “half of the highway” means all
traffic lanes of a highway which are designated for traffic traveling
in one direction, and includes the entire highway in the case of a
one-way highway.
Sec. 18. NRS 484B.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484B.307,
it is unlawful for any driver to disobey the instructions of any
official traffic-control device placed in accordance with the
provisions of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS, unless at
the time otherwise directed by a police officer.
2. No provision of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS
for which such devices are required may be enforced against an
alleged violator if at the time and place of the alleged violation the
device is not in proper position and sufficiently legible to be seen by
an ordinarily observant person. Whenever a particular provision of
chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS does not state that such
devices are required, the provision is effective even though no
devices are erected or in place.
3. Whenever devices are placed in position approximately
conforming to the requirements of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive,
of NRS, such devices are presumed to have been so placed by the
official act or direction of a public authority, unless the contrary is
established by competent evidence.
4. Any device placed pursuant to the provisions of chapters
484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS and purporting to conform to the
lawful requirements pertaining to such devices is presumed to
comply with the requirements of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive,
of NRS unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.
5. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 19. NRS 484B.303 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.303 1. Whenever official traffic-control devices are
erected indicating that no right or left turn is permitted, it is
unlawful for any driver of a vehicle to disobey the directions of any
such devices.
2. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 20. NRS 484B.307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.307 1. Whenever traffic is controlled by official traffic-
control devices exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted
arrows, successively one at a time or in combination as declared in
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 17 –
the manual and specifications adopted by the Department of
Transportation, only the colors green, yellow and red may be used,
except for special pedestrian-control devices carrying a word legend
as provided in NRS 484B.283. The lights, arrows and combinations
thereof indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as
provided in this section.
2. When the signal is circular green alone:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal may proceed straight
through or turn right or left unless another device at the place
prohibits either or both such turns. Such vehicular traffic, including
vehicles turning right or left, must yield the right-of-way to other
vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an
adjacent crosswalk at the time the signal is exhibited.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal may proceed across the
highway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk, unless directed
otherwise by another device as provided in NRS 484B.283.
3. Where the signal is circular green with a green turn arrow:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal may proceed to make the
movement indicated by the green turn arrow or such other
movement as is permitted by the circular green signal, but the traffic
must yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an
adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the
intersection at the time the signal is exhibited. Drivers turning in the
direction of the arrow when displayed with the circular green are
thereby advised that so long as a turn arrow is illuminated,
oncoming or opposing traffic simultaneously faces a steady red
signal.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal may proceed across the
highway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk, unless directed
otherwise by another device as provided in NRS 484B.283.
4. Where the signal is a green turn arrow alone:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal may proceed only in the
direction indicated by the arrow signal so long as the arrow is
illuminated, but the traffic must yield the right-of-way to pedestrians
lawfully within the adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully
using the intersection.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal shall not enter the highway
until permitted to proceed by another device as provided in
NRS 484B.283.
5. Where the signal is a green straight-through arrow alone:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal may proceed straight
through, but must not turn right or left. Such vehicular traffic must
yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 18 –
within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk at the time the
signal is exhibited.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal may proceed across the
highway within the appropriate marked or unmarked crosswalk,
unless directed otherwise by another device as provided in
NRS 484B.283.
6. Where the signal is a steady yellow signal alone:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal is thereby warned that the
related green movement is being terminated or that a steady red
indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter, and such
vehicular traffic must not enter the intersection when the red signal
is exhibited.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal, unless otherwise directed
by another device as provided in NRS 484B.283, are thereby
advised that there is insufficient time to cross the highway.
7. Where the signal is a flashing yellow turn arrow, displayed
alone or in combination with another signal:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal is permitted to cautiously
enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by the
arrow signal, or other such movement as is permitted by other signal
indications displayed at the same time. Such vehicular traffic must
yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection
or an adjacent crosswalk and yield the right-of-way to other traffic
lawfully within the intersection.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal, unless otherwise directed
by another device as provided in NRS 484B.283, are thereby
advised that there may be insufficient time to cross the highway, but
may proceed across the highway within the appropriate marked or
unmarked crosswalk.
8. Where the signal is a steady red signal alone:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal must stop before entering
the crosswalk on the nearest side of the intersection where the sign
or pavement marking indicates where the stop must be made, or in
the absence of any such crosswalk, sign or marking, then before
entering the intersection, and, except as otherwise provided in
paragraphs (c) and (d), must remain stopped or standing until the
green signal is shown.
(b) Pedestrians facing such a signal shall not enter the highway,
unless permitted to proceed by another device as provided in
NRS 484B.283.
(c) After complying with the requirement to stop, vehicular
traffic facing such a signal and situated on the extreme right of the
highway may proceed into the intersection for a right turn only
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 19 –
when the intersecting highway is two-directional or one-way to the
right, or vehicular traffic facing such a signal and situated on
the extreme left of a one-way highway may proceed into the
intersection for a left turn only when the intersecting highway is
one-way to the left, but must yield the right-of-way to pedestrians
and other traffic proceeding as directed by the signal at the
intersection.
(d) After complying with the requirement to stop, a person
driving a motorcycle, moped or trimobile or riding a bicycle, an
electric bicycle or an electric scooter may proceed straight through
or turn right or left if:
(1) The person waits for two complete cycles of the lights or
lighted arrows of the applicable official traffic-control device and
the signal does not change because of a malfunction or because the
signal failed to detect the presence of the motorcycle, moped,
trimobile, bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter;
(2) No other device at the place prohibits either or both such
turns, if applicable; and
(3) The person yields the right-of-way to pedestrians and
other traffic proceeding as directed by the signal at the intersection.
(e) Vehicular traffic facing the signal may not proceed on or
through any private or public property to enter the intersecting street
where traffic is not facing a red signal to avoid the red signal.
9. Where the signal is a steady red with a green turn arrow:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), vehicular
traffic facing the signal may enter the intersection only to make the
movement indicated by the green turn arrow, but must yield the
right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk
and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection. Drivers turning in
the direction of the arrow are thereby advised that so long as the turn
arrow is illuminated, oncoming or opposing traffic simultaneously
faces a steady red signal.
(b) A person driving a motorcycle, moped or trimobile or riding
a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric scooter facing the signal
may proceed straight through or turn in the direction opposite that
indicated by the green turn arrow if:
(1) The person stops before entering the crosswalk on the
nearest side of the intersection where the sign or pavement marking
indicates where the stop must be made or, in the absence of any
such crosswalk, sign or marking, before entering the intersection;
(2) The person waits for two complete cycles of the lights or
lighted arrows of the applicable official traffic-control device and
the signal does not change because of a malfunction or because the
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 20 –
signal failed to detect the presence of the motorcycle, moped,
trimobile, bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter;
(3) No other device at the place prohibits the turn, if
applicable; and
(4) The person yields the right-of-way to pedestrians
lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully
using the intersection.
(c) Pedestrians facing such a signal shall not enter the highway,
unless permitted to proceed by another device as provided in
NRS 484B.283.
10. If a person violates paragraph (d) of subsection 8 or
paragraph (b) of subsection 9 and that violation results in an injury
to another person, the violation creates a rebuttable presumption of
all facts necessary to impose civil liability for the injury.
11. If a signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an
intersection, the provisions of this section are applicable except as to
those provisions which by their nature can have no application. Any
stop required must be made at a sign or pavement marking
indicating where the stop must be made, but in the absence of any
such device the stop must be made at the signal.
12. Whenever signals are placed over the individual lanes of a
highway, the signals indicate, and apply to drivers of vehicles, as
follows:
(a) A downward-pointing green arrow means that a driver facing
the signal may drive in any lane over which the green signal is
shown.
(b) A red “X” symbol means a driver facing the signal must not
enter or drive in any lane over which the red signal is shown.
13. A local authority shall not adopt an ordinance or regulation
or take any other action that prohibits vehicular traffic from crossing
an intersection when:
(a) The red signal is exhibited; and
(b) The vehicular traffic in question had already completely
entered the intersection before the red signal was exhibited. For the
purposes of this paragraph, a vehicle shall be considered to have
“completely entered” an intersection when all portions of the vehicle
have crossed the limit line or other point of demarcation behind
which vehicular traffic must stop when a red signal is displayed.
14. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to the additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.135 [.] or
section 2 of this act.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 21 –
Sec. 21. NRS 484B.317 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.317 1. A person shall not, without lawful authority,
attempt to or alter, deface, injure, knock down or remove any
official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal or any
inscription, shield or insigne thereon, or any other part thereof.
2. A person who violates subsection 1:
(a) Is guilty of a misdemeanor; and
(b) May be subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS
484B.130 or 484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 22. NRS 484B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.320 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) A person shall not operate a vehicle on the highways of this
State if the vehicle is equipped with any device or mechanism,
including, without limitation, a mobile transmitter, that is capable of
interfering with or altering the signal of a traffic-control signal.
(b) A person shall not operate any device or mechanism,
including, without limitation, a mobile transmitter, that is capable of
interfering with or altering the signal of a traffic-control signal.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person
shall not in this State sell or offer for sale any device or mechanism,
including, without limitation, a mobile transmitter, that is capable of
interfering with or altering the signal of a traffic-control signal. The
provisions of this subsection do not prohibit a person from selling or
offering for sale:
(a) To a provider of mass transit, a signal prioritization device;
or
(b) To a response agency, a signal preemption device or a signal
prioritization device, or both.
3. A police officer:
(a) Shall, without a warrant, seize any device or mechanism,
including, without limitation, a mobile transmitter, that is capable of
interfering with or altering the signal of a traffic-control signal; or
(b) May, without a warrant, seize and take possession of a
vehicle equipped with any device or mechanism that is capable of
interfering with or altering the signal of a traffic-control signal,
including, without limitation, a mobile transmitter, if the device or
mechanism cannot be removed from the motor vehicle by the police
officer, and may cause the vehicle to be towed and impounded until:
(1) The device or mechanism is removed from the vehicle;
and
(2) The owner claims the vehicle by paying the cost of the
towing and impoundment.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 22 –
4. Neither the police officer nor the governmental entity which
employs the officer is civilly liable for any damage to a vehicle
seized pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 3
that occurs after the vehicle is seized but before the towing process
begins.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, the presence
of any device or mechanism, including, without limitation, a mobile
transmitter, that is capable of interfering with or altering the signal
of a traffic-control signal in or on a vehicle on the highways of this
State constitutes prima facie evidence of a violation of this section.
The State need not prove that the device or mechanism in question
was in an operative condition or being operated.
6. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 or 2 is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
7. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 or 2
may be subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130
or 484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
8. A provider of mass transit shall not operate or cause to be
operated a signal prioritization device in such a manner as to impede
or interfere with the use by response agencies of signal preemption
devices.
9. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, prohibit a
provider of mass transit from acquiring, possessing or operating a
signal prioritization device.
(b) Prohibit a response agency from acquiring, possessing or
operating a signal preemption device or a signal prioritization
device, or both.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Mobile transmitter” means a device or mechanism that is:
(1) Portable, installed within a vehicle or capable of being
installed within a vehicle; and
(2) Designed to affect or alter, through the emission or
transmission of sound, infrared light, strobe light or any other
audible, visual or electronic method, the normal operation of a
traffic-control signal.
 The term includes, without limitation, a signal preemption device
and a signal prioritization device.
(b) “Provider of mass transit” means a governmental entity or a
contractor of a governmental entity which operates, in whole or in
part:
(1) A public transit system, as that term is defined in NRS
377A.016; or
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 23 –
(2) A system of public transportation referred to in
NRS 277A.270.
(c) “Response agency” means an agency of this State or of a
political subdivision of this State that provides services related to
law enforcement, firefighting, emergency medical care or public
safety. The term includes a nonprofit organization or private
company that, as authorized pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS:
(1) Provides ambulance service; or
(2) Provides the level of medical care provided by an
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic to sick or
injured persons at the scene of an emergency or while transporting
those persons to a medical facility.
(d) “Signal preemption device” means a mobile transmitter that,
when activated and when a vehicle equipped with such a device
approaches an intersection controlled by a traffic-control signal,
causes:
(1) The signal, in the direction of travel of the vehicle, to
remain green if the signal is already displaying a green light;
(2) The signal, in the direction of travel of the vehicle, to
change from red to green if the signal is displaying a red light;
(3) The signal, in other directions of travel, to remain red or
change to red, as applicable, to prevent other vehicles from entering
the intersection; and
(4) The applicable functions described in subparagraphs (1),
(2) and (3) to continue until such time as the vehicle equipped with
the device is clear of the intersection.
(e) “Signal prioritization device” means a mobile transmitter
that, when activated and when a vehicle equipped with such a
device approaches an intersection controlled by a traffic-control
signal, causes:
(1) The signal, in the direction of travel of the vehicle, to
display a green light a few seconds sooner than the green light
would otherwise be displayed;
(2) The signal, in the direction of travel of the vehicle, to
display a green light for a few seconds longer than the green light
would otherwise be displayed; or
(3) The functions described in both subparagraphs (1) and
(2).
(f) “Traffic-control signal” means a traffic-control signal, as
defined in NRS 484A.290, which is capable of receiving and
responding to an emission or transmission from a mobile
transmitter.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 24 –
Sec. 23. NRS 484B.327 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.327 1. It is unlawful for any person to remove any
barrier or sign stating that a highway is closed to traffic.
2. It is unlawful to pass over a highway that is marked, signed
or barricaded to indicate that it is closed to traffic. A person who
violates any provision of this subsection may be subject to any
additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or 484B.135 [.] or
section 2 of this act.
Sec. 24. NRS 484B.363 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.363 1. A person shall not drive a motor vehicle at a
speed in excess of 15 miles per hour in an area designated as a
school zone except:
(a) On a day on which school is not in session;
(b) During [the] any period [from a half hour after school is no
longer in operation to a half hour before school is next in operation;]
specified by the governing body of a local government or the
Department of Transportation pursuant to subsection 6;
(c) If the zone is designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the hours when the pupils of the school are in class
and the yellow lights of the speed limit beacon are not flashing in
the manner which indicates that the speed limit is in effect; or
(d) If the zone is not designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the times when the sign designating the school zone
indicates that the speed limit is not in effect.
2. A person shall not drive a motor vehicle at a speed in excess
of 25 miles per hour in an area designated as a school crossing zone
except:
(a) On a day on which school is not in session;
(b) During [the] any period [from a half hour after school is no
longer in operation to a half hour before school is next in operation;]
specified by the governing body of a local government or the
Department of Transportation pursuant to subsection 6;
(c) If the zone is designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the hours when the pupils of the school are in class
and the yellow lights of the speed limit beacon are not flashing in
the manner which indicates that the speed limit is in effect; or
(d) If the zone is not designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the times when the sign designating the school zone
indicates that the speed limit is not in effect.
3. The driver of a vehicle shall not make a U-turn in an area
designated as a school zone or school crossing zone except:
(a) When there are no children present;
(b) On a day on which school is not in session;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 25 –
(c) During [the] any period [from a half hour after school is no
longer in operation to a half hour before school is next in operation;]
specified by the governing body of a local government or the
Department of Transportation pursuant to subsection 6;
(d) If the zone is designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the hours when the pupils of the school are in class
and the yellow lights of the speed limit beacon are not flashing in
the manner which indicates that the speed limit is in effect; or
(e) If the zone is not designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the times when the sign designating the school zone
or school crossing zone indicates that the speed limit is not in effect.
4. The driver of a vehicle shall not overtake and pass another
vehicle traveling in the same direction in an area designated as a
school zone or school crossing zone except:
(a) On a day on which the school is not in session;
(b) During [the] any period [from a half hour after school is no
longer in operation to a half hour before school is next in operation;]
specified by the governing body of a local government or the
Department of Transportation or pursuant to subsection 6;
(c) If the zone is designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the hours when the pupils of the school are in class
and the yellow lights of the speed limit beacon are not flashing in
the manner which indicates that the speed limit is in effect; or
(d) If the zone is not designated by an operational speed limit
beacon, during the times when the sign designating the school zone
or school crossing zone indicates that the speed limit is not in effect.
5. The governing body of a local government [or] with respect
to highways under its jurisdiction and the Department of
Transportation with respect to highways constructed and
maintained under the authority of chapter 408 of NRS shall
designate school zones and school crossing zones. [An area must not
be designated as a school zone if imposing a speed limit of 15 miles
per hour would be unsafe because of higher speed limits in
adjoining areas.]
6. [Each such] Subject to subsection 7, and in addition to the
authority described in NRS 244.357, 268.425, 269.185, 484B.610
and 484B.613, each governing body of a local government and the
Department of Transportation , as applicable, shall [provide signs to
mark the beginning and end of] specify for each school zone and
school crossing zone [which] that it respectively designates [. Each
sign marking the beginning of such a zone must include a
designation of the hours when the speed limit is in effect or that the
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 26 –
speed limit is in effect when children are present.] one or more
periods during which:
(a) A person may drive a motor vehicle at a speed in excess of
15 miles per an hour pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) A person may drive a motor vehicle at a speed in excess of
25 miles per hour pursuant to subsection 2;
(c) A driver of a vehicle may make a U-turn pursuant to
subsection 3; or
(d) A driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle
traveling in the same direction pursuant to subsection 4.
7. [With respect to each school zone and school crossing zone
in a school district, the superintendent of the school district or his or
her designee, in conjunction with the Department of Transportation
and the governing body of the local government that designated the
school zone or school crossing zone and after consulting with the
principal of the school and the agency that is responsible for
enforcing the speed limit in the zone, shall determine the times
when the speed limit is in effect.] A single period specified
pursuant to subsection 6:
(a) May apply to one or more of the acts described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of subsection 6; and
(b) May not include the 30 minutes after school is no longer in
operation or the 30 minutes before school is next in operation.
8. If, while violating any provision of subsections 1 to 4,
inclusive, the driver of a motor vehicle is the proximate cause of a
collision with a pedestrian or a person riding a bicycle, an electric
bicycle or an electric scooter, the driver is subject to the additional
penalty set forth in subsection 4 of NRS 484B.653.
9. As used in this section, “speed limit beacon” means a device
which is used in conjunction with a sign and equipped with two or
more yellow lights that flash alternately to indicate when the speed
limit in a school zone or school crossing zone is in effect.
Sec. 25. NRS 484B.367 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.367 1. In addition to the requirements set forth in this
section and pursuant to the powers described in NRS 268.425 and
269.185, as applicable, each governing body of a local government
or the Department of Transportation that designates a school zone
or school crossing zone pursuant to NRS 484B.363 shall:
(a) Provide signs to mark the beginning and end of the school
zone or school crossing zone.
(b) Prescribe the standards for the design, application,
installation and maintenance of the signs designating the
conditions that apply to the school zone and school crossing zone.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 27 –
2. In prescribing the standards described in subsection 1, the
governing body of a local government or the Department of
Transportation may:
(a) Consult with the superintendent of the school district or the
designee of the superintendent and any agency that is responsible
for enforcing the speed limit in the school zone or school crossing
zone; and
(b) Collaborate with the Department of Transportation, if
applicable, and other governing bodies of local governments in the
same county for the purpose of promoting uniformity of signs and
other devices for school zones and school crossing zones.
3. Each permanent sign which designates a school zone or
school crossing zone and the speed limit in that zone must be
uniform in size and color and must clearly designate [the] :
(a) The hours during which the speed limit applies [.
2.] ; or
(b) That the speed limit applies when children are present.
4. Each portable sign designating a school zone or school
crossing zone and the speed limit in the zone must be uniform in
size and color.
5. A portable sign may be placed on or beside a roadway only
during those hours when pupils are arriving at and leaving regularly
scheduled school sessions.
Sec. 26. NRS 484B.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.403 1. A U-turn may be made on any road where the
turn can be made with safety, except as prohibited by this section
and by the provisions of NRS 484B.227, 484B.363 and 484B.407.
2. If an official traffic-control device indicates that a U-turn is
prohibited, the driver shall obey the directions of the device.
3. The driver of a vehicle shall not make a U-turn in a business
district, except at an intersection or on a divided highway where an
appropriate opening or crossing place exists.
4. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section,
local authorities and the Department of Transportation may prohibit
U-turns at any location within their respective jurisdictions.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 27. NRS 484B.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.450 1. A person shall not stop, stand or park a vehicle,
except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in
compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or official
traffic-control device, in any of the following places:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 28 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, on a sidewalk;
(b) In front of a public or private driveway;
(c) Within an intersection;
(d) Within 15 feet of a fire hydrant in a place where parallel
parking is permitted, or within 20 feet of a fire hydrant if angle
parking is permitted and a local ordinance requires the greater
distance;
(e) On a crosswalk;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484B.520, within 20
feet of a marked or unmarked crosswalk;
(g) Within 30 feet upon the approach to any official traffic-
control signal located at the side of a highway;
(h) Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within 30
feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety
zone;
(i) Within 50 feet of the nearest rail of a railroad;
(j) Within 20 feet of a driveway entrance to any fire station and,
on the side of a highway opposite the entrance to any fire station,
within 75 feet of that entrance;
(k) Alongside or opposite any highway excavation or
obstruction when stopping, standing or parking would obstruct
traffic;
(l) On the highway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the
edge of or curb of a highway;
(m) Upon any bridge or other elevated structure or within a
highway tunnel;
(n) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, within 5 feet
of a public or private driveway; and
(o) At any place where official traffic-control devices prohibit
stopping, standing or parking.
2. The provisions of paragraph (n) of subsection 1 do not apply
to a person operating a vehicle of the United States Postal Service if
the vehicle is being operated for the official business of the United
States Postal Service.
3. A person may park a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter on a sidewalk provided that the bicycle, electric
bicycle or electric scooter does not impede the normal and
reasonable movement of pedestrians on the sidewalk.
4. A person shall not move a vehicle not owned by the person
into any prohibited area or away from a curb to a distance which is
unlawful.
5. A local authority may place official traffic-control devices
prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing or parking of
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 29 –
vehicles on any highway where in its opinion stopping, standing or
parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the
vehicles which are stopping, standing or parking would unduly
interfere with the free movement of traffic. It is unlawful for any
person to stop, stand or park any vehicle in violation of the
restrictions stated on those devices.
6. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to the additional penalty set forth in section 2 of this act.
Sec. 28. NRS 484B.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.600 1. It is unlawful for any person to drive or operate
a vehicle of any kind or character at:
(a) A rate of speed greater than is reasonable or proper, having
due regard for the traffic, surface and width of the highway, the
weather and other highway conditions.
(b) Such a rate of speed as to endanger the life, limb or property
of any person.
(c) A rate of speed greater than that posted by a public authority
for the particular portion of highway being traversed.
(d) A rate of speed that results in the injury of another person or
of any property.
(e) In any event, a rate of speed greater than 80 miles per hour.
2. If, while violating any provision of subsection 1, the driver
of a motor vehicle is the proximate cause of a collision with a
pedestrian or a person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter, the driver is subject to the additional penalty set
forth in subsection 4 of NRS 484B.653.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may be
subject to the additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
4. Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person is issued a
traffic citation for a violation of any provision of subsection 1, the
court may, in its discretion, reduce the violation from a moving
traffic violation to a violation that is not a moving traffic violation if
the person:
(a) Admits to committing the violation and pays the entire
amount of the fine and all fees due on or before the date on which
the person is first required to make an appearance relating to the
citation; and
(b) Provides the court with a copy of his or her driving record.
5. The court shall not reduce a violation pursuant to subsection
4 if the driving record of the person demonstrates a pattern of
moving traffic violations.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 30 –
6. Any fine imposed pursuant to paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (e) of
subsection 1 must not exceed $20 for each mile per hour a person
travels above the posted speed limit or the proper rate of speed at
which the person should be traveling, as applicable. The provisions
of this subsection apply regardless of whether a person pays the
entire amount of the fine and all fees due in accordance with
subsection 4.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a person who
commits a violation of any provision of this section that causes
physical injury to a person or damage to property shall be punished
by a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.
8. A person who commits a violation of any provision of this
section and, at the time the violation was committed, was operating
a vehicle at a rate of speed that was 30 miles per hour or more over
that posted by a public authority is guilty of a misdemeanor.
9. As used in this section, “driving record” means a record of:
(a) Each conviction for a traffic offense that occurred within the
immediately preceding 10 years;
(b) Each finding that a person committed a civil infraction
within the immediately preceding 10 years; and
(c) Each citation issued to a person for a moving traffic violation
that was subsequently reduced to a nonmoving violation within the
immediately preceding 10 years.
Sec. 29. NRS 484B.603 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.603 1. The fact that the speed of a vehicle is lower than
the prescribed limits does not relieve a driver from the duty to
decrease speed when approaching and crossing an intersection,
when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a
hill crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding highway, or
when special hazards exist or may exist with respect to pedestrians
or other traffic, or by reason of weather or other highway conditions,
and speed must be decreased as may be necessary to avoid colliding
with any person, vehicle or other conveyance on or entering a
highway in compliance with legal requirements and the duty of all
persons to use due care.
2. Any person who fails to use due care as required by
subsection 1 may be subject to any additional penalty set forth in
NRS 484B.130 or 484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 30. NRS 484B.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.650 1. A driver commits an offense of aggressive
driving if, during any single, continuous period of driving within the
course of 1 mile, the driver does all the following, in any sequence:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 31 –
(a) Commits one or more acts of speeding in violation of NRS
484B.363 or 484B.600.
(b) Commits two or more of the following acts, in any
combination, or commits any of the following acts more than once:
(1) Failing to obey an official traffic-control device in
violation of NRS 484B.300.
(2) Overtaking and passing another vehicle upon the right by
driving off the paved portion of the highway in violation of
NRS 484B.210.
(3) Improper or unsafe driving upon a highway that has
marked lanes for traffic in violation of NRS 484B.223.
(4) Following another vehicle too closely in violation of
NRS 484B.127.
(5) Failing to yield the right-of-way in violation of any
provision of NRS 484B.250 to 484B.267, inclusive.
(c) Creates an immediate hazard, regardless of its duration, to
another vehicle or to another person, whether or not the other person
is riding in or upon the vehicle of the driver or any other vehicle.
2. A driver may be prosecuted and convicted of an offense of
aggressive driving in violation of subsection 1 whether or not the
driver is issued a civil infraction citation pursuant to NRS
484A.7035 for committing, or is found to have committed, any of
the acts described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1 that are
punishable as a civil infraction.
3. A driver who commits an offense of aggressive driving in
violation of subsection 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(a) For the first offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $250 but not more than $1,000;
or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $1,000 but not more than
$1,500; or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(c) For the third and each subsequent offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $1,500 but not more than
$2,000; or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
4. In addition to any other penalty pursuant to subsection 3:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 32 –
(a) For the first offense within 2 years, the court shall order the
driver to attend, at the driver’s own expense, a course of traffic
safety approved by the Department and may issue an order
suspending the driver’s license of the driver for a period of not more
than 30 days.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense within 2 years, the court
shall issue an order revoking the driver’s license of the driver for a
period of 1 year.
5. To determine whether the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b)
of subsection 4 apply to one or more offenses of aggressive driving,
the court shall use the date on which each offense of aggressive
driving was committed.
6. If the driver is already the subject of any other order
suspending or revoking his or her driver’s license, the court shall
order the additional period of suspension or revocation, as
appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
7. If the court issues an order suspending or revoking the
driver’s license of the driver pursuant to this section, the court shall
require the driver to surrender to the court all driver’s licenses then
held by the driver. The court shall, within 5 days after issuing the
order, forward the driver’s licenses and a copy of the order to the
Department.
8. If the driver successfully completes a course of traffic safety
ordered pursuant to this section, the Department shall cancel three
demerit points from his or her driving record in accordance with
NRS 483.448 or 483.475, as appropriate, unless the driver would
not otherwise be entitled to have those demerit points cancelled
pursuant to the provisions of that section.
9. This section does not preclude the suspension or revocation
of the driver’s license of the driver, or the suspension of the future
driving privileges of a person, pursuant to any other provision of
law.
10. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may
be subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 31. NRS 484B.653 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.653 1. It is unlawful for a person to:
(a) Drive a vehicle in willful or wanton disregard of the safety of
persons or property on a highway or premises to which the public
has access.
(b) Drive a vehicle in an unauthorized speed contest on a
highway or premises to which the public has access.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 33 –
(c) Organize an unauthorized speed contest on a highway or
premises to which the public has access.
(d) Drive a vehicle in an unauthorized trick driving display on a
highway or premises to which the public has access.
(e) Facilitate an unauthorized trick driving display on a highway
or premises to which the public has access.
 A violation of paragraph (a), (b) or (d) of this subsection or
subsection 1 of NRS 484B.550 constitutes reckless driving.
2. If, while violating the provisions of subsections 1 to 5,
inclusive, of NRS 484B.270, NRS 484B.280, paragraph (a) or (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 484B.283, NRS 484B.350, subsections 1 to 4,
inclusive, of NRS 484B.363 or subsection 1 of NRS 484B.600, the
driver of a motor vehicle on a highway or premises to which the
public has access is the proximate cause of a collision with a
pedestrian or a person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter, the violation constitutes reckless driving.
3. A person who violates paragraph (a) of subsection 1 is guilty
of a misdemeanor and:
(a) For the first offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $250 but not more than $1,000;
or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $1,000 but not more than
$1,500; or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(c) For the third and each subsequent offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $1,500 but not more than
$2,000; or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
4. A person who violates paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 1
or commits a violation which constitutes reckless driving pursuant
to subsection 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(a) For the first offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $250 but not
more than $1,000;
(2) Shall perform not less than 50 hours, but not more than
99 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 34 –
(b) For the second offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 but
not more than $1,500;
(2) Shall perform not less than 100 hours, but not more than
199 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
(c) For the third and each subsequent offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500 but
not more than $2,000;
(2) Shall perform 200 hours of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
5. In addition to any fine, community service and
imprisonment imposed upon a person pursuant to subsection 4, the
court:
(a) Shall issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the
person for a period of not less than 6 months but not more than 2
years and requiring the person to surrender all driver’s licenses then
held by the person;
(b) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraph
(a), shall forward to the Department any licenses, together with a
copy of the order;
(c) For the first offense, may issue an order impounding, for a
period of 15 days, any vehicle that is registered to the person who
violates paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 1 if the vehicle is used in
the commission of the offense;
(d) For the second and each subsequent offense, shall issue an
order impounding, for a period of 30 days, any vehicle that is
registered to the person who violates paragraph (b) or (c) of
subsection 1 if the vehicle is used in the commission of the offense;
(e) If the court issues an order for impoundment pursuant to
paragraph (c) or (d), shall require the Department to rescind and
cancel the registration of the vehicle unless the registered owner
completes an inspection of the vehicle as prescribed by subsection 3
of NRS 482.460; and
(f) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraph (c)
or (d) and paragraph (e), shall forward to the Department the
number of the license plate of the vehicle and the year, make and
model of the vehicle to be impounded, together with a copy of the
orders.
6. A person who violates paragraph (d) of subsection 1 is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor and:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 35 –
(a) For the first offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 but
not more than $1,500;
(2) Shall perform not less than 100 hours, but not more than
199 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 364 days.
(b) For the second offense and each subsequent offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500 but
not more than $2,000;
(2) Shall perform 200 hours of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 364 days.
7. A person who violates paragraph (e) of subsection 1 is guilty
of:
(a) For the first offense, a misdemeanor and:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000;
(2) Shall perform not less than 50 hours, but not more than
99 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense and each subsequent offense, a gross
misdemeanor and:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 and
not more than $1,500;
(2) Shall perform not less than 100 hours, but not more than
199 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 364 days.
8. In addition to any fine, community service and
imprisonment imposed upon a person pursuant to subsection 6 or 7,
the court:
(a) May issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the
person for a period of not less than 6 months but not more than 2
years and requiring the person to surrender all driver’s licenses then
held by the person;
(b) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraph
(a), shall forward to the Department any licenses, together with a
copy of the order;
(c) May issue an order impounding, for a period of 30 days, any
vehicle that is registered to the person if the vehicle is used in the
commission of the offense;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 36 –
(d) If the court issues an order for impoundment pursuant to
paragraph (c), shall require the Department to rescind and cancel the
registration of the vehicle unless the registered owner completes an
inspection of the vehicle as prescribed by subsection 3 of NRS
482.460; and
(e) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraphs
(c) and (d), shall forward to the Department the number of the
license plate of the vehicle and the year, make and model of the
vehicle to be impounded, together with a copy of the orders.
9. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to subsection 4
of NRS 484B.550, a person who does any act or neglects any duty
imposed by law while driving or in actual physical control of any
vehicle on a highway or premises to which the public has access in
willful or wanton disregard of the safety of persons or property, if
the act or neglect of duty proximately causes the death of or
substantial bodily harm to another person, is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), a minimum
term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6
years and by a fine of not less than $2,000 but not more than $5,000.
(b) A minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum
term of not more than 10 years and by a fine of not less than $2,000
but not more than $5,000 if:
(1) The violation involves operating a vehicle at a rate of
speed that is 50 miles per hour or more over the posted speed limit;
or
(2) The violation is committed in an area designated as a
pedestrian safety zone or school zone or a school crossing zone.
10. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 or section 2 of this act unless the person is subject to the
penalty provided pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 484B.550.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Facilitate” means to plan, schedule or promote, or assist in
the planning, scheduling or promotion of, an unauthorized trick
driving display or in any other way participate in an unauthorized
trick driving display, including, without limitation:
(1) Using a vehicle to divert, slow, impede or otherwise
block traffic with the intent to enable or assist an unauthorized trick
driving display; or
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 37 –
(2) Filming or otherwise recording an unauthorized trick
driving display with the intent to promote an unauthorized trick
driving display.
(b) “Organize” means to plan, schedule or promote, or assist in
the planning, scheduling or promotion of, an unauthorized speed
contest on a highway or premises to which the public has access,
regardless of whether a fee is charged for attending the unauthorized
speed contest.
(c) “Trick driving display” means using a vehicle to perform
tricks, stunts or other maneuvers on a highway, or premises to which
the public has access, upon which traffic has been diverted, slowed,
impeded or blocked to enable the performing of such tricks, stunts
or maneuvers or having such tricks, stunts or maneuvers filmed or
otherwise recorded.
Sec. 32. NRS 484B.657 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.657 1. A person who, while driving or in actual
physical control of any vehicle on a highway or premises to which
the public has access, proximately causes the death of another
person through an act or omission that constitutes simple negligence
is guilty of vehicular manslaughter and shall be punished for a
misdemeanor.
2. A person who commits an offense of vehicular manslaughter
may be subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130
or 484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
3. Upon the conviction of a person for a violation of the
provisions of subsection 1, the court shall notify the Department of
the conviction.
4. Upon receipt of notification from a court pursuant to
subsection 3, the Department shall cause an entry of the conviction
to be made upon the driving record of the person so convicted.
Sec. 33. NRS 484C.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.110 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath; or
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway
or on premises to which the public has access.
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 38 –
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway
or on premises to which the public has access. The fact that any
person charged with a violation of this subsection is or has been
entitled to use that drug under the laws of this State is not a defense
against any charge of violating this subsection.
3. It is unlawful for any person to drive or be in actual physical
control of a vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public
has access with an amount of any of the following prohibited
substances in his or her blood or urine that is equal to or greater
than:
Urine Blood
Nanograms Nanograms
Prohibited substance per milliliter per milliliter
(a) Amphetamine 500 100
(b) Cocaine 150 50
(c) Cocaine metabolite 150 50
(d) Heroin 2,000 50
(e) Heroin metabolite:
(1) Morphine 2,000 50
(2) 6-monoacetyl morphine 10 10
(f) Lysergic acid diethylamide 25 10
(g) Methamphetamine 500 100
(h) Phencyclidine 25 10
4. For any violation that is punishable pursuant to paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400, it is unlawful for any person
to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway or
on premises to which the public has access with an amount of any of
the following prohibited substances in his or her blood that is equal
to or greater than:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 39 –
Blood
Nanograms
Prohibited substance per milliliter
(a) Marijuana (delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol) 2
(b) Marijuana metabolite (11-OH-tetrahydrocannabinol) 5
5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after driving or being in actual physical control of the
vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath was tested, to cause
the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in
his or her blood or breath. A defendant who intends to offer this
defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days
before the trial or hearing or at such other time as the court may
direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of
that intent.
6. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
Sec. 34. NRS 484C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.120 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.04 or more but less than
0.08 in his or her blood or breath; or
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle to
have a concentration of alcohol of 0.04 or more but less than 0.08 in
his or her blood or breath,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a commercial motor
vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public has access.
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a commercial motor
vehicle,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a commercial motor
vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public has access.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 40 –
The fact that any person charged with a violation of this subsection
is or has been entitled to use that drug under the laws of this State is
not a defense against any charge of violating this subsection.
3. It is unlawful for any person to drive or be in actual physical
control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway or on premises
to which the public has access with any prohibited substance in his
or her blood or urine. As used in this subsection, “prohibited
substance” means any substance described in 21 C.F.R. § 1308.11.
4. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after driving or being in actual physical control of the
commercial motor vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath was
tested, to cause the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol of
0.04 or more in his or her blood or breath. A defendant who intends
to offer this defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must, not less
than 14 days before the trial or hearing or at such other time as the
court may direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a written
notice of that intent.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 483.939,
484B.130 or 484B.135 [.] or section 2 of this act.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or
combination of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport
passengers or property if the motor vehicle:
(1) Has a gross combination weight rating of 26,001 or more
pounds which includes a towed unit with a gross vehicle weight
rating of more than 10,000 pounds;
(2) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more
pounds;
(3) Is designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including
the driver; or
(4) Regardless of size, is used in the transportation of
materials which are considered to be hazardous for the purposes of
the federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. §§
5101 et seq., and for which the display of identifying placards is
required pursuant to 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F.
(b) The phrase “concentration of alcohol of 0.04 or more but
less than 0.08 in his or her blood or breath” means 0.04 gram or
more but less than 0.08 gram of alcohol per 100 milliliters of the
blood of a person or per 210 liters of his or her breath.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 41 –
Sec. 35. NRS 268.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.425 The city council or other governing body of each
incorporated city, whether incorporated by general or special act,
shall cause to be displayed, in each school zone and school crossing
zone where the city has posted a speed limit, signs or other devices
designating [the] :
1. The times during which the speed limit in the zone is to
apply [.] ; or
2. That the speed limit in the zone applies when children are
present.
Sec. 36. NRS 269.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.185 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 707.375, in
addition to the powers and jurisdiction conferred upon the town
boards or boards of county commissioners by this chapter, such
boards may:
(a) Regulate traffic upon the streets and alleys of towns or cities
governed by such boards pursuant to this chapter.
(b) Regulate the speed, parking, stopping, turning and operation
of all motor vehicles and other vehicles using the streets and alleys.
(c) Pass and adopt all ordinances, rules and regulations, and do
and perform all acts and things necessary for the execution of the
powers and jurisdiction conferred by this section.
2. The town board or board of county commissioners shall
cause to be displayed, in each school zone and school crossing zone
where the county has posted a speed limit, signs or other devices
designating [the] :
(a) The times during which the speed limit in the zone is to
apply [.] ; or
(b) That the speed limit in the zone applies when children are
present.
Sec. 36.2. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 36.3 and 36.4 of this act.
Sec. 36.3. 1. A public school shall not include any data or
information concerning a pupil within a directory of pupils
maintained by the school other than the name, grade level and
school photograph of a pupil.
2. As used in this section, “school photograph” means a
photograph of a pupil that is used in an official publication of the
school, including, without limitation:
(a) An honor roll or other recognition list;
(b) A newsletter;
(c) A playbill;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 42 –
(d) A program for a graduation, an interscholastic activity or
event, an extracurricular activity or other ceremony; and
(e) A yearbook.
Sec. 36.4. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388.281
to 388.296, inclusive, or as necessary to provide instructional
programming and services or wrap-around services to a pupil, a
school district or public school shall not disclose the phone
number or address of any pupil or parent or legal guardian of a
pupil to a third party unless required by federal law or a subpoena,
warrant or order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
2. A third party may request information concerning a pupil
contained in a directory pursuant to section 36.3 of this act by
submitting a written request to the applicable public school
containing:
(a) The date of the request;
(b) The purpose for which the third party will use the
requested information; and
(c) Either:
(1) If the information is requested for a journalistic
purpose, an affirmation that the requested information will only
be used for a journalistic purpose and sufficient documentation to
demonstrate that the person requesting the information is a
reporter or editorial employee who is employed by or affiliated
with a newspaper, press association or commercially operated,
federally licensed radio or television station; or
(2) If the information is not requested for a journalistic
purpose, an affirmation that the requested information will only
be used for the purpose described pursuant to paragraph (b) and
that such information will not be sold, transferred or distributed to
any other party.
3. Each school district shall comply with the requirements of
the Every Student Succeeds Act, 20 U.S.C. § 7908 when providing
information concerning a pupil pursuant to this section.
Sec. 37. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 38. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 39. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
36th Special Session (2025)